2018-komp-ling/practicals/finite-state morphology/chv.twol
Alphabet
  а ӑ е ё ӗ и о у ӳ ы э ю я б в г д ж з к л м н п р с ҫ т ф х ц ч ш щ й ь ъ
  А Ӑ Е Ё Ӗ И О У Ӳ Ы Э Ю Я Б В Г Д Ж З К Л М Н П Р С Ҫ Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Й Ь Ъ 
  1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9
 %{А%}:а %{А%}:е
 %{Ă%}:ӑ %{Ă%}:ӗ %{Ă%}:0
 %{м%}:м %{м%}:0
 %{ъ%}:0
 %{э%}:0 %{л%}:0 %{с%}:0 %{а%}:0
 %{Т%}:р %{Т%}:т
 %-
;

Sets 

BackVow = ӑ а ы о у я ё ю %{ъ%};

FrontVow = ӗ э и ӳ; 

Cns = б в г д ж з к л м н п р с ҫ т ф х ц ч ш щ й ь ъ ; 

Vow = а ӑ е ё ӗ и о у ӳ ы э ю я ;

ArchiCns = %{м%} ;

Rules 

"Remove morpheme boundary"
%>:0 <=> _ ;

"Back vowel harmony for archiphoneme {A}"
%{А%}:а <=> BackVow: [ Cns: | %>: ]+ _ ; 

"Back vowel harmony for archiphoneme {Ă}"
%{Ă%}:ӑ <=> BackVow: [ ArchiCns: | Cns: | %>: ]+ _ ;
		except
									%{м%}: %>:  _ н ; 
                                    Vow: %>:  _ н ;
                                     
"Non surface {Ă} in plural and singular genitive"
%{Ă%}:0 <=> [ Vow: | %{м%}: ] %>: _ н ;

"Deleting м in plural genitive"
%{м%}:0 <=> _ %>: %{Ă%}: н ;

"Ablative surface consonant т" 
%{Т%}:т <=> %{л%}: %- %>: _ ; 

"Ablative vowel harmony"
%{А%}:а <=> %{э%}: [%{л%}: | %{с%}: ]* %- %>: [%{Т%}:р | %{Т%}:т] _ ;
